District of Columbia statutes.
26-1120.03

Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information challenge process.

The Commissioner shall establish a process whereby licensees may challenge information entered into the NMLSR by the Commissioner.

Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-155, § 21c
as added July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-38, § 2(o), 56 DCR 4290
Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-38 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. Except for section 2(c)(1), (g), (j), and (o), this act shall not apply until the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking has promulgated rules implementing this act.”